Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.590

Official controls—Notice of hearing.

Notice of the time, place and purpose of the hearing shall be given by one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county and in the official gazette, if any, of the county at least ten days before the hearing. The board may prescribe additional methods for providing notice.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.590. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 59.]